District of Columbia statutes.
10-1221.12

Maintenance of documents.

Copies of the specimen bonds and of the final Financing Documents and Closing Documents shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of the District of Columbia.

History

Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 112, 53 DCR 5430

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 112 of New Convention Center Hotel Omnibus Financing and Development Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-404, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5404).